Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3317
License holder; appeal of administrative decision; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the department pursuant to section 43-3316 may, upon exhaustion of the procedures for administrative review provided under the Administrative Procedure Act, seek judicial review within ten days after the issuance of notice of the department's decision pursuant to section 43-3316. Notwithstanding subdivision (2)(a) of section 84-917, proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition in the court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the support order was issued or registered or, in the case of a foreign support order not registered in Nebraska, the court of competent jurisdiction as specified in subdivision (2)(e)(ii) of section 43-3314.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 155.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.